California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) A description of the procedure that the architect and the client will use to accommodate additional services and contract changes, including, but not limited to, changes in the description of the project, in the description of the services, or in the description of the compensation and method of payment.

(6) A description of the procedure to be used by either party to terminate the contract.

(7) A statement identifying the ownership and use of
 instruments of service prepared by the architect.

(8) A statement in at least 12-point type that reads: “Architects are licensed and regulated by the California Architects Board located at 2420 Del Paso Road, Suite 105, Sacramento, CA 95834.”

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Professional services rendered by an architect for which the client will not pay compensation.

(2) An arrangement as to the basis for compensation and manner of providing professional services implied by the fact that the architect’s services are of the same general kind which the architect has previously rendered to and received payment from the same client.

(3) If the client knowingly
 states in writing after full disclosure of this section that a writing which complies with the requirements of this section is not required.

(4) Professional services rendered by an architect to a professional engineer registered to practice engineering under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), or to a land surveyor licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700).

(5) Professional services rendered by an architect to a public agency when using that public agency’s written contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 7.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.25.

(a) A licensed architect who signs and stamps plans, specifications, reports, or documents shall not be responsible for damage caused by subsequent changes to or uses of those plans, specifications, reports, or documents, where the subsequent changes or uses, including changes or uses made by state or local governmental agencies, are not authorized or approved in writing by the licensed architect who originally signed the plans, specifications, reports, or documents, provided that the written authorization or approval was not unreasonably withheld by the architect and the architectural service rendered by the architect who signed and stamped the plans, specifications, reports, or documents was not also
 a proximate cause of the damage.

(b) The signing and stamping of plans, specifications, reports, or documents which relate to the design of fixed works shall not impose a legal duty or responsibility upon the person signing the plans, specifications, reports, or documents to observe the construction of the fixed works that are the subject of the plans, specifications, reports, or documents. However, this section shall not preclude an architect and a client from entering into a contractual agreement that includes a mutually acceptable arrangement for the provision of construction observation services. This subdivision shall not modify the liability of an architect who undertakes, contractually or otherwise, the provision of construction observation services for rendering those services.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “construction observation services” means periodic observation of completed work to determine general compliance with the plans, specifications, reports, or other contract documents. However, “construction observation services” does not mean the superintendence of construction processes, site conditions, operations, equipment, or personnel, or the maintenance of a safe place to work or any safety in, on, or about the site.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “periodic observation” means visits by an architect, or their agent, to the site of a work of improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 5.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.26.

The use of the words “certify” or “certification” by a licensed architect in the practice of architecture constitutes an expression of professional opinion regarding those facts or findings that are the subject of the certification, and does not constitute a warranty or guarantee, either expressed or implied. Nothing in this section is intended to alter the standard of care ordinarily exercised by a licensed architect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.27.

(a) An architect who voluntarily, without compensation or expectation of compensation, provides structural inspection services at the scene of a declared national, state, or local emergency caused by a major earthquake, flood, riot, or fire at the request of a public official, public safety officer, or city or county building inspector acting in an official capacity shall not be liable in negligence for any personal injury, wrongful death, or property damage caused by the architect’s good faith but negligent inspection of a structure used for human habitation or a structure owned by a public entity for structural integrity or nonstructural elements affecting life and safety.

The immunity provided by this section shall apply only for an inspection that occurs within 30 days of the declared emergency.

Nothing in this section shall provide immunity for gross negligence or willful misconduct.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Architect” has the meaning given by Section 5500.

(2) “Public safety officer” has the meaning given in Section 3301 of the Government Code.

(3) “Public official” means a state or local elected officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 759, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.3.

(a) In the event of damage to residential real property caused by a natural disaster declared by the Governor, if the damage may be covered by one or more policies of insurance, any architect or other person who has prepared plans used for the construction or remodeling of the residential real property shall release a copy of the plans to the homeowner’s insurer or the homeowner, or duly authorized agent of the insurer or the homeowner, upon request and verification that the plans will be used solely for the purpose of verifying the fact and amount of damage for insurance purposes.

(b) No homeowner or any other person shall use any copy of plans obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) to rebuild all or any part of the residential real property without the prior written consent of the architect or other person who prepared the plans.

(c) In the event prior written consent is not provided pursuant to subdivision (b), no architect or other person who has prepared plans who releases a copy of plans pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be liable to any person if the plans are subsequently used by the homeowner or any other person to rebuild all or any part of the residential real property.

(d) The architect or other person may charge a reasonable fee to cover the reproduction costs of providing a copy of the plans.

(e) As used in this section, “residential real property” means a single family structure, whether or not owner-occupied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.4.

(a) No person may use an architect’s instruments of service, as those professional services are described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5500.1, without the consent of the architect in a written contract, written agreement, or written license specifically authorizing that use.

(b) An architect shall not unreasonably withhold consent to use their instruments of service from a person for whom the architect provided the services. An architect may reasonably withhold consent to use the instruments of service for cause, including, but not limited to, lack of full payment for services provided or failure to fulfill the conditions of a written
 contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.5.

Any person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 5536 in connection with the offer or performance of architectural services for the repair of damage to a residential or nonresidential structure caused by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, shall be punished by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or for two or three years, or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by a fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both
 the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 14.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit any person from preparing plans, drawings, or specifications for any of the following:

(1) Single-family dwellings of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height.

(2) Multiple dwellings containing no more than four dwelling units of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height. However, this paragraph shall not be construed as allowing an unlicensed person to design multiple clusters of up to four dwelling units each to form apartment or condominium complexes where the total exceeds four units on any lawfully divided lot.

(3) Garages or other structures appurtenant to buildings described under subdivision (a), of woodframe construction not more than two stories and basement in height.

(4) Agricultural and ranch buildings of woodframe construction, unless the building official having jurisdiction deems that an undue risk to the public health, safety, or welfare is involved.

(b) If any portion of any structure exempted by this section deviates from substantial compliance with conventional framing requirements for woodframe construction found in the most recent edition of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations or tables of limitation for woodframe construction, as defined by the applicable building code duly adopted by the local jurisdiction or the state, the building official having jurisdiction shall require the preparation of plans, drawings, specifications, or calculations for that portion by, or under the responsible control of, a licensed architect or registered engineer. The documents for that portion shall bear the stamp and signature of the licensee who is responsible for their preparation. Substantial compliance for purposes of this section is not intended to restrict the ability of the building officials to approve plans pursuant to existing law and is only intended to clarify the intent of Chapter 405 of the Statutes of 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.1.

A structural engineer, defined as a registered civil engineer who has been authorized to use the title structural engineer under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), insofar as he or she practices the profession for which he or she is registered, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that a structural engineer may not use the title “architect,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.2.

This chapter shall not be construed as authorizing a licensed contractor to perform design services beyond those described in Section 5537 or in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000), unless those services are performed by or under the direct supervision of a person licensed to practice architecture under this chapter, or a professional or civil engineer licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3, insofar as the professional or civil engineer practices the profession for which he or she is registered under that chapter.

However, this section does not prohibit a licensed contractor from performing any of the services permitted by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 within the classification for which the license is issued. Those services may include the preparation of shop and field drawings for work which he or she has contracted or offered to perform, and designing systems and facilities which are necessary to the completion of contracting services which he or she has contracted or offered to perform.

However, a licensed contractor may not use the title “architect,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.4.

A professional engineer registered to practice engineering under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), insofar as he or she practices the profession for which he or she is registered, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that a professional engineer may not use the title “architect,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5537.3 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 7.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.5.

A civil engineer authorized to use that title under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), insofar as he or she practices the profession for which he or she is registered, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that a civil engineer may not use the title “architect,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5537.4 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.6.

A landscape architect registered under the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615), insofar as he or she practices the profession for which he or she is registered, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that a landscape architect may not use the title “architect,” exclusive of the word “landscape,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5537.5 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.7.

A land surveyor licensed under the provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3, insofar as he or she practices the profession for which he or she is licensed under Chapter 15 of Division 3, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that a land surveyor may not use the title “architect,” unless he or she holds a license as required in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.

This chapter does not prohibit any person from furnishing either alone or with contractors, if required by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3, labor and materials, with or without plans, drawings, specifications, instruments of service, or other data covering such labor and materials to be used for any of the following:

(a) For nonstructural or nonseismic storefronts, interior alterations or additions, fixtures, cabinetwork, furniture, or other appliances or equipment.

(b) For any nonstructural or nonseismic work necessary to provide for their installation.

(c) For any nonstructural or nonseismic alterations or additions to any building necessary to or attendant upon the installation of those storefronts, interior alterations or additions, fixtures, cabinetwork, furniture, appliances, or equipment, provided those alterations do not change or affect the structural system or safety of the building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance of Certificates [5550. - 5559.]

5550.

Subject to the rules and regulations governing examinations, any person who meets the qualifications set forth in this article shall be entitled to an examination for a license to practice architecture. Before taking the examination, the person shall file their application for examination with the board and pay the application fee fixed by this chapter. The fee shall be retained by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 7.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5550.1.

(a) An applicant for a license to practice architecture shall be required, as part of the examination for licensure, to demonstrate to the board’s satisfaction their knowledge and understanding of and proficiency in exterior and interior barrier free design.

(b) The board shall include questions regarding exterior and interior barrier free design as part of the examination. Those questions shall periodically be reviewed by the board to ensure that the examination reflects current regulations and the latest developments in barrier free design.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 8.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5550.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 5552, the board may grant eligibility to take the licensure examination to a candidate enrolled in
 a degree program accepted by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards that integrates the licensure degree experience and examination components required under this chapter. The eligibility point shall be determined by that degree program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 634, Sec. 3.   (SB 1479)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5550.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 111, the board may adopt guidelines for the delegation of its authority to grade the examinations of applicants for licensure to any vendor under contract to the board for provision of an architect’s registration examination. The guidelines shall be within the board’s legal authority to establish the standards for registration in this state, and shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Goals for the appropriate content, development, grading, and administration of an examination, against which the vendor’s rules and procedures can be judged.

(2) Procedures through which the board can reasonably assure itself that the vendor
 adequately meets the goals established by the board.

(b) The board shall not delegate its authority to grade the examinations of candidates for registration in this state to any vendor or any party not in compliance with Section 111 or with the guidelines established in subdivision (a).

(c) A candidate who received full credit for all divisions of the Architect Registration Examination (ARE) prior to May 1, 2023, shall be deemed to have passed the ARE.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 87.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5550.5.

Notwithstanding Section 30 of this code or Section 17520 of the Family Code, the board may accept for processing an application from an individual for an original or renewed license to practice architecture containing an individual tax identification number, or other appropriate identification number as determined by the board, in lieu of a social security number, if the individual is not eligible for a social security account number at the time of application and is not in noncompliance with a judgment or order for support pursuant to Section 17520 of the Family
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.   (AB 1822)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5551.

If the applicant’s examination is satisfactory, and if no charges of having resorted to deception in obtaining the license, or any other violation of the provisions of this chapter have been filed with the board, upon the payment of the license fee fixed by this chapter, the board shall issue a license to the applicant showing that the person named therein is entitled to practice architecture in this state, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.

The applicant for a license to practice architecture shall:

(a) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(b) Furnish evidence of having completed eight years of training and educational experience in architectural work. A five-year degree from a school of architecture approved by the board shall be deemed equivalent to five years of training and educational experience in architectural work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.1.

(a) Pursuant to Section 144, beginning January 1, 2021, the board has the authority to obtain and receive criminal history information. The information obtained as a result of the fingerprinting shall be used in accordance with Section 11105 of the Penal Code and to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of a license pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Sections 5560 and 5577.

(b) As a condition of application for a license, each applicant shall furnish to the Department of Justice a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and to undergo a state and federal level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice.

(c) The board shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, pursuant to Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The applicant shall pay for the reasonable regulatory costs for furnishing the fingerprints and conducting the searches.

(e) The applicant shall certify, under penalty of perjury, when applying for a license, whether the applicant’s fingerprints have been furnished to the Department of Justice in compliance with this section.

(f) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section renders the application for a license incomplete, and the application shall not be considered until the applicant demonstrates compliance with all of the requirements of this section.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the results of any criminal offender record information request by either state or federal law enforcement authorities shall not be released by the board except in accordance with state and federal requirements.

(h) This section applies to all applicants subject to this chapter and subdivision (i).

(i) As used in this section, the term “applicant” is limited to an initial applicant who has never been registered or licensed by the board or to an applicant for a new licensure or registration category.

(j) As a condition of petitioning the board for reinstatement of a revoked or surrendered license, an applicant shall comply with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 6.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.2.

(a) The board may request that a licensee identify their race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, or gender identity. The data may be requested when an initial license is issued or at the time of license renewal.

(b) The board shall maintain the confidentiality of the information it receives from a licensee under this section and shall only release the information in an aggregate form that cannot be used to identify an individual.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide the information specified in subdivision (a) as a condition of licensure or license renewal, and a licensee shall not be subject to
 discipline for not providing the information specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The board may publish the aggregate demographic data that it collects pursuant to this section on its internet website.

(e) Beginning January 1, 2025, the board shall submit the aggregate demographic data that it collects pursuant to this section to the department. The department shall post the information provided by the board on the department’s website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 342)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.5.

The board may, by regulation, implement an architectural education and training experience or internship program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 9.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.6.

(a) The board may extend a candidate’s application or examination process beyond the five-year period described in Section 109 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations if a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Any extension granted under subdivision (a) shall be an amount of time sufficient to supplement the time lost due to the state of emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 9.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5553.

Issuance of a license may be denied if evidence is received by the board of the commission or doing by the applicant of any act which, if committed or done by the holder of a license, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of that license. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5554.

The certificate shall contain the name of the person to whom issued. Proper index and record of each certificate shall be kept by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1405, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5555.

Licenses to practice architecture remain in full force until revoked or suspended for cause, or until they expire, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

5557.

A duplicate license to practice architecture, replacing one which has been lost, destroyed, or mutilated, may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board. The duplicate license fee fixed by this chapter shall be charged for that issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5558.

(a) Each person holding a license to practice architecture under this chapter shall file with the board their current mailing address, email address, and the proper and current name and address of the entity or entities through which they provide architectural services. For purposes of this section, “entity” means any individual, firm,
 corporation, or limited liability partnership.

(b) (1) The board shall post the information obtained in subdivision (a) to its internet website, pursuant to Section 5559, except for email addresses.

(2) To protect the privacy of licensees, the email addresses provided to the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 10.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5559.

(a) Each applicant for examination or licensure who has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application.

(b) A licensee who has a valid email address shall report that email address to the board at the time of renewal.

(c) Each applicant or licensee shall notify the board within 30 days of any change to their email address on file with the board.

(d) To protect the privacy of applicants and licensees, the email addresses provided to the board pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be considered a
 public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) Information sent from an email account of the board to a valid email address provided by an applicant or licensee is presumed to have been delivered to the email address provided.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant or licensee is currently receiving email at the time the application or license renewal is submitted to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 11.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Proceedings [5560. - 5590.]

5560.

The board may upon its own motion, and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any architect and may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke, the license of any architect who is guilty of, or commits one or more of, the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5561.

All accusations against licensees charging the holder of a license issued under this chapter with the commission of any act constituting a cause for disciplinary action shall be filed with the board within five years after the board discovers, or through the use of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, whichever occurs first, but not more than 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action. However, with respect to an accusation alleging a violation of Section 5579, the accusation may be filed within three years after the discovery by the board of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by Section 5579.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

5561.5.

The proceedings for the suspension or revocation of licenses under this article shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5565.

The board’s decision may do the following:

(a) Provide for the immediate complete suspension by the holder of the license of all operations as an architect during the period fixed by the decision.

(b) Permit the holder of the license to complete any or all contracts for the performance of architectural services shown by evidence taken at the hearing to be then unfinished.

(c) Impose upon the holder of the license compliance with any specific conditions as may be just in connection with their operations as an architect disclosed at the hearing, and may
 further provide that until those conditions are complied with no application for restoration of the suspended or revoked license shall be accepted by the board.

(d) Assess a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) against the holder of a license for any of the causes specified in Section 5577. A fine may be assessed in lieu of, or in addition to, a suspension or revocation. All fines collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited to the credit of the California Architects Board Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 12.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5570.

In any proceeding for review by a court, the court may permit, in its discretion, upon the filing of a proper bond by the holder of the license in an amount to be fixed by the court, guaranteeing the compliance by the holder of the license with specific conditions imposed upon them by the board’s decision, if any, the holder of the license to continue to practice as an architect pending entry of judgment by the court in the case. There shall be no stay of the board’s decision pending an appeal or review of any proceeding, unless the appellant or applicant for review files a bond in all respects conditioned as, and similar to, the bond required to stay the effect of the board’s decision in the first
 instance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 13.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5571.

A judgment of suspension or cancellation of a certificate by the superior court shall be subject to appeal or review in accordance with the provisions of law as to appeal from or review of judgments of superior courts.

There shall be no stay of execution or enforcement of the judgment pending any proceedings on appeal or review unless the appellant or applicant for review shall file a bond in all respects conditioned as, and similar to, the bond required to stay the effect of the board’s decision in the first instance.

The clerk of the court whose judgment has become final shall, within 10 days after its entry, transmit, by regular United States mail, to the executive officer of the board a notice containing information as to the affirmance, modification, or reversal of the judgment of the superior court in the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 47.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5573.

After suspension of a license upon any of the grounds set forth in this chapter, the board may reinstate the license upon proof of compliance by the architect with all provisions of the decision as to reinstatement or, in the absence of that decision or any provisions therein as to reinstatement, in the sound discretion of the board. A license which has been suspended is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter, but that renewal does not entitle the holder of the license, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to practice architecture, or to engage in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this chapter, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the license, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5577.

The conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of an architect by the holder of a license constitutes a ground for disciplinary action. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge in whose court the conviction is obtained, is conclusive evidence of the conviction.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

5578.

The fact that the holder of a license is practicing in violation of the provisions of this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

5579.

The fact that the holder of a license has obtained the license by fraud or misrepresentation, or that the person named in the license has obtained it by fraud or misrepresentation constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

5580.

The fact that the holder of a license is impersonating an architect or former architect of the same or similar name, or is practicing under an assumed, fictitious, or corporate name, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5582.

The fact that the holder of a license has aided or abetted in the practice of architecture any person not authorized to practice architecture under the provisions of this chapter, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

5582.1.

(a) The fact that the holder of a license has affixed their signature to plans, drawings, specifications, or other instruments of service which have not been prepared by them, or under their responsible control, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(b) The fact that the holder of a license has permitted their name to be used for the purpose of assisting any person to evade the provisions of this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 14.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5583.

The fact that, in the practice of architecture, the holder of a license has been guilty of fraud or deceit constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

5584.

The fact that, in the practice of architecture, the holder of a license has been guilty of negligence or willful misconduct constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.

The fact that in the practice of architecture the holder of a license has been guilty of incompetency or recklessness constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5586.

The fact that the holder of a license has had disciplinary action taken by any public agency for any act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties as an architect constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.
